Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1354.01
Employee rights; not restricted.

Nothing in sections 81-1301 to 81-1329 shall prohibit state employees from exercising their rights granted in Chapter 48, article 8, or any other applicable sections of law.

Laws 1987, LB 491, § 11;

Laws 2026, LB1048, § 20.
July 18, 2026